Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-537
Baiting prohibited; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to hunt any game birds by attracting them to the place where hunted by the distribution of grain or other feed, commonly called baiting. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 257.